Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Spouse and Children Unprovided for in Wills

§ 15-2-301. Omitted spouse.

If a testator fails to provide by will for his surviving spouse who married the testator after the execution of the will, the omitted spouse shall receive the same share of the estate he would have received if the decedent left no will unless it appears from the will that the omission was intentional or the testator provided for the spouse by transfer outside the will and the intent that the transfer be in lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by statements of the testator or from the amount of the transfer or other evidence.

In satisfying a share provided by this section, the devises made by the will abate as provided in section 15-3-902[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

§ 15-2-302. Pretermitted children.

If a testator fails to provide in his will for any of his children born or adopted after the execution of his will, the omitted child receives a share in the estate equal in value to that which he would have received if the testator had died intestate unless:

it appears from the will that the omission was intentional;

when the will was executed the testator had one (1) or more children and devised substantially all his estate to the other parent of the omitted child; or

the testator provided for the child by transfer outside the will and the intent that the transfer be in lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by statements of the testator or from the amount of the transfer or other evidence.

If at the time of execution of the will the testator fails to provide in his will for a living child solely because he believes the child to be dead, the child receives a share in the estate equal in value to that which he would have received if the testator had died intestate.

In satisfying a share provided by this section, the devises made by the will abate as provided in section 15-3-902[, Idaho Code,] of this code.